test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_nieida_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - nieidâ:
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Nom: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Gen: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Acc: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Ill: nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Loc: nieidâst
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Com: nieidáin
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Abe: nieidâttáá
    nieidâ+N+Ess: nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Par: nieidâd
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Nom: nieidah
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Gen: [nieidâi, nieidâi]
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Acc: nieidâid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Ill: nieidáid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Loc: nieidâin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Com: nieidâiguin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Abe: nieidâittáá

  Noun - ruoidâ:
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruoidâst
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Com: ruoidáin
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruoidâttáá
    ruoidâ+N+Ess: ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Par: ruoidâd
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruoidah
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruoidâi, ruoidâi]
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruoidâid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruoidáid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruoidâin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Com: ruoidâiguin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruoidâittáá

  Noun - mielgâ:
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Ill: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâst
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Com: mielgáin
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâttáá
    mielgâ+N+Ess: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Par: mielgâd
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Nom: mielgah
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [mielgâi, mielgâi]
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Ill: mielgáid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Com: mielgâiguin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâittáá

  Noun - kuorgâ:
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuorgâst
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Com: kuorgáin
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuorgâttáá
    kuorgâ+N+Ess: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Par: kuorgâd
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuorgah
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuorgâi, kuorgâi]
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuorgâid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuorgáid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuorgâin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Com: kuorgâiguin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuorgâittáá

  Noun - vuovdâ:
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuovdâst
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Com: vuovdáin
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuovdâttáá
    vuovdâ+N+Ess: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Par: vuovdâd
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuovdah
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuovdâi, vuovdâi]
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuovdâid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuovdáid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuovdâin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Com: vuovdâiguin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuovdâittáá

  Noun - čuoškâ:
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Nom: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Gen: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Acc: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Ill: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Loc: čuoškâst
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Com: čuoškáin
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Abe: čuoškâttáá
    čuoškâ+N+Ess: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Par: čuoškâd
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Nom: čuoškah
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čuoškâi, čuoškâi]
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Acc: čuoškâid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Ill: čuoškáid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Loc: čuoškâin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Com: čuoškâiguin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Abe: čuoškâittáá

  Noun - lievlâ:
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Nom: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Gen: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Acc: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Ill: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Loc: lievlâst
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Com: lievláin
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Abe: lievlâttáá
    lievlâ+N+Ess: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Par: lievlâd
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Nom: lievlah
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Gen: [lievlâi, lievlâi]
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Acc: lievlâid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Ill: lievláid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Loc: lievlâin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Com: lievlâiguin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Abe: lievlâittáá
